Nevada, session 83, SB423.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 439 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 4, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 3 and 4 of this act, unless the
context otherwise requires, “health authority” means:
1. A health district created pursuant to NRS 439.362 or
subsection 1 of NRS 439.370; or
2. A federally recognized American Indian tribe pursuant to
25 C.F.R. §§ 83.1 to 83.12, inclusive, that is located in whole or in
part in this State.
Sec. 2.5. As used in sections 3.5 and 4 of this act, unless the
context otherwise requires, “health authority” means a health
district created pursuant to NRS 439.362 or subsection 1 of
NRS 439.370.
-
*SB423_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 3. 1. The Account for Public Health is hereby created
in the State General Fund.
2. The Division shall administer the Account.
3. The interest and income earned on money in the Account
must be credited to the Account.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8 and
subsection 4 of section 4 of this act, any money remaining in the
Account at the end of each fiscal year does not revert to the State
General Fund and must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, money
credited to the Account pursuant to NRS 680B.060 during each
biennium must be used for the following purposes in the following
prescribed amounts:
(a) Eight hundred thousand dollars for use by the Division to
protect and promote public health.
(b) Three hundred thousand dollars to make allocations
pursuant to section 4 of this act to health authorities which are
Indian tribes.
(c) Two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars per each county
which is not within the jurisdiction of a health district created
pursuant to NRS 439.362 or subsection 1 of NRS 439.370, for use
by the Division to protect and promote public health in each such
county.
(d) Two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars per each county
within the jurisdiction of a health district created pursuant to NRS
439.362 or subsection 1 of NRS 439.370 to make allocations
pursuant to section 4 of this act to each such health district.
6. Except for money which reverts to the Account from a
health authority pursuant to subsection 4 of section 4 of this act,
money remaining in the Account on April 2 of an even-numbered
year and money which is credited to the Account pursuant to NRS
680B.060 after April 1 of an even-numbered year and on or before
June 30 of an odd-numbered year which would otherwise be
required to be used for the purpose described in paragraph (b) or
(d) of subsection 5 becomes part of the reserve of the Account.
Money in the reserve may be used by the Division to protect and
promote public health.
7. Any money allocated from the Account to the Division
pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection 5 that is not
committed for expenditure for the purpose for which it was
distributed on or before June 30 of an odd-numbered year reverts
to the Account, becomes part of the reserve of the Account and
must be included in the calculation of the reserve on June 30 for
the purposes of subsection 8.
-
*SB423_R1*

– 4 –
8. Any reserve of the Account which exceeds 4 percent of the
total money credited to the Account pursuant to NRS 680B.060
during the then current biennium and has not been committed for
expenditure on or before June 30 of an odd-numbered year reverts
to the State General Fund.
9. If the amount of money credited to the Account pursuant
to NRS 680B.060 during the biennium is insufficient to allocate
the full amounts prescribed by subsection 5, the money credited to
the Account pursuant to NRS 680B.060 during the biennium must
be allocated for the purposes prescribed by subsection 5 in the
same proportion as the amounts prescribed by subsection 5.
10. On or before November 30 of an odd-numbered year, the
Division shall submit to the State Board of Health a report
concerning the use of money in the Account.
Sec. 3.5. 1. The Account for Public Health is hereby
created in the State General Fund.
2. The Division shall administer the Account.
3. The interest and income earned on money in the Account
must be credited to the Account.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8 and
subsection 4 of section 4 of this act, any money remaining in the
Account at the end of each fiscal year does not revert to the State
General Fund and must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, money
credited to the Account pursuant to NRS 680B.060 during each
biennium must be used for the following purposes in the following
prescribed amounts:
(a) Eight hundred thousand dollars for use by the Division to
protect and promote public health.
(b) Three hundred thousand dollars for remittance to the
Account for Tribal Health created by section 9 of Senate Bill No.
312 of this session for use by the Tribal Health Authority Council
created by section 5 of Senate Bill No. 312 of this session.
(c) Two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars per each county
which is not within the jurisdiction of a health district created
pursuant to NRS 439.362 or subsection 1 of NRS 439.370, for use
by the Division to protect and promote public health in each such
county.
(d) Two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars per each county
within the jurisdiction of a health district created pursuant to NRS
439.362 or subsection 1 of NRS 439.370 to make allocations
pursuant to section 4 of this act to each such health district.
6. Except for money which reverts to the Account for Public
Health from a health authority pursuant to subsection 4 of section
4 of this act, money remaining in the Account on April 2 of an
-
*SB423_R1*

– 5 –
even-numbered year and money which is credited to the Account
pursuant to NRS 680B.060 after April 1 of an even-numbered year
and on or before June 30 of an odd-numbered year which would
otherwise be required to be used for the purposes described in
paragraph (d) of subsection 5 becomes part of the reserve of the
Account. Money in the reserve may be used by the Division to
protect and promote public health.
7. Any money allocated from the Account to the Division
pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection 5 that is not
committed for expenditure for the purpose for which it was
distributed on or before June 30 of an odd-numbered year reverts
to the Account, becomes part of the reserve of the Account and
must be included in the calculation of the reserve on June 30 for
the purposes of subsection 8.
8. Any reserve of the Account which exceeds 4 percent of the
total money credited to the Account pursuant to NRS 680B.060
during the then current biennium and has not been committed for
expenditure on or before June 30 of an odd-numbered year reverts
to the State General Fund.
9. If the amount of money credited to the Account pursuant
to NRS 680B.060 during the biennium is insufficient to allocate
the full amounts prescribed by subsection 5, the money credited to
the Account pursuant to NRS 680B.060 during the biennium must
be allocated for the purposes prescribed by subsection 5 in the
same proportion as the amounts prescribed by subsection 5.
10. On or before November 30 of an odd-numbered year, the
Division shall submit to the State Board of Health a report
concerning the use of money in the Account.
Sec. 4. 1. On or before December 1 of each odd-numbered
year, the Division shall publish on the Internet website of the
Division an estimate of the amount of money in the Account for
Public Health which will be available for allocation pursuant to
this section to health authorities during the then current
biennium.
2. On or before January 1 of each even-numbered year, a
health authority may submit to the Division a request for an
allocation from the Account for Public Health. The request must
be accompanied by a proposal for the use of the allocation which
includes, without limitation:
(a) An evaluation and identification of the public health needs
of residents of the area under the jurisdiction of the health
authority;
(b) A determination of the level of priority of the public health
needs identified pursuant to paragraph (a); and
-
*SB423_R1*

– 6 –
(c) A plan for spending the money allocated from the Account
for Public Health which is in accordance with the levels of priority
determined pursuant to paragraph (b) and includes spending for
one or more of the following public health services:
(1) Control of communicable diseases;
(2) Prevention of chronic diseases and injuries;
(3) Environmental public health;
(4) Maternal, child and family health;
(5) Access to and linkage with medical, oral and behavioral
health services;
(6) Vital records;
(7) Assessing the health of populations;
(8) Planning for public health emergencies;
(9) Communications;
(10) Development and support of policy;
(11) Development of community partnerships;
(12) Business competencies; and
(13) Such other public health services as the State Board of
Health prescribes by regulation.
3. On or before March 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Division shall review each request submitted pursuant to
subsection 2 and approve those that meet the requirements of this
section, within the limits of money available for the health
authority making the request.
4. On or before April 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Division shall allocate money from the Account for Public Health
to each health authority whose request has been approved
pursuant to subsection 3. Money allocated pursuant to this section
is available for use by the health authority during both fiscal years
of the biennium. Any money allocated pursuant to this section that
is not committed for expenditure for the purpose for which it was
distributed on or before June 30 of an odd-numbered year reverts
to the Account for Public Health. Any amount which reverts from
a health authority to the Account for Public Health:
(a) Must be accounted for separately.
(b) May be used by the Division for statewide public health
services or public health services in the region served by the health
authority from which the money reverted.
(c) Reverts from the Account for Public Health to the State
General Fund on June 30 of the year immediately following the
year during which the money reverted to the Account.
5. On or before October 31 of an odd-numbered year, each
health authority that received an allocation from the Account for
Public Health pursuant to this section in the immediately
-
*SB423_R1*

– 7 –
preceding biennium shall submit to the Division a report which
includes, without limitation:
(a) A description of the process used by the health authority
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2 to evaluate the public
health needs of residents of the area under the jurisdiction of the
health authority and the public health needs identified through
that process;
(b) A description of the process used by the health authority
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 to determine the level of
priority of the public health needs identified pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 and the levels of priority assigned to
those public health needs through that process;
(c) A description of each expenditure of the allocated money
made by the health authority;
(d) The amount of any unexpended balance of the allocated
money at the end of the biennium; and
(e) Such other information in such form as the Division may
require.
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. NRS 680B.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
680B.060 1. The taxes imposed under NRS 680B.027 must
be collected by the Department of Taxation and promptly deposited
with the State Treasurer . The State Treasurer shall deposit:
(a) The first $4,925,000 of the money so received by the State
Treasurer in each biennium, for credit to the Account for Public
Health created by section 3 of this act.
(b) Any additional amount of the money so received by the
State Treasurer, for credit to the State General Fund.
2. If the tax is not paid by the insurer on or before the date
required for payment, the tax then becomes delinquent, and payment
thereof may be enforced by court action instituted on behalf of the
State by the Attorney General. The Attorney General may employ
additional counsel in the city where the home office of the insurer is
located, subject to the approval of compensation for such services
by the State Board of Examiners. The administrative and substantive
enforcement provisions of chapters 360 and 372 of NRS apply to the
enforcement of the taxes imposed under NRS 680B.027.
3. Upon the tax becoming delinquent, the Executive Director
of the Department of Taxation shall notify the Commissioner, who
shall suspend or revoke the insurer’s certificate of authority pursuant
to NRS 680A.190.
4. If a dispute arises between an insurer and the State as to the
amount of tax, if any, payable, the insurer is entitled to pay under
protest the tax in the amount assessed by the Department of
-
*SB423_R1*

– 8 –
Taxation, without waiving or otherwise affecting any right of the
insurer to recover any amount determined, through appropriate legal
action taken by the insurer against the Department of Taxation, to
have been in excess of the amount of tax lawfully payable.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 and NRS
680C.110, all taxes, fees, licenses, fines and charges collected under
this Code, including the general premium tax provided for under
NRS 680B.027 and as increased in any instances pursuant to NRS
680A.330, must be promptly deposited with the State Treasurer for
credit to the State General Fund.
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 10 of
section 3 of this act, the first report required by that subsection must
be submitted by the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services on or before October 31,
2029.
Sec. 9.5. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 10 of
section 3.5 of this act, the first report required by that subsection
must be submitted by the Division of Public and Behavioral Health
of the Department of Health and Human Services on or before
October 31, 2029.
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. 1. This section and sections 1, 4 to 8, inclusive, 10
and 11 of this act become effective on July 1, 2027.
2. Sections 2, 3 and 9 of this act become effective on July 1,
2027, if and only if Senate Bill No. 312 of this session is not enacted
by the Legislature and approved by the Governor.
3. Sections 2.5, 3.5 and 9.5 of this act become effective on
July 1, 2027, if and only if Senate Bill No. 312 of this session is
enacted by the Legislature and approved by the Governor.
H
-
*SB423_R1*